Utah statutes.
61-2b-10.   State-licensed appraiser -- Authority and qualifications.
(1)  A state-licensed appraiser is authorized to appraise complex and
noncomplex 1-4 family residential units in this state having a transaction
value permitted under the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and
Enforcement Act of 1989, and related federal regulations.
(2)  A state-licensed appraiser is authorized to appraise vacant or unimproved
land having a transaction value permitted under the Financial Institutions
Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, and related federal regulations
that is utilized for 1-4 family purposes or for which the highest and best use
is 1-4 family purposes and subdivisions for which a development
analysis/appraisal is not necessary.
(3)  A state-licensed appraiser may not issue a certified appraisal report.
(4)  To qualify as a state-licensed appraiser, an applicant must:
(a)  be of good moral character;
(b)  pass the licensing examination with a satisfactory score as determined by
the board;
(c)  successfully complete not less than 150 classroom hours in courses of
study approved by the board that relate to:
(i)  real estate appraisal;
(ii)  the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice; and
(iii)  ethical rules to be observed by a real estate appraiser as required by
Section 61-2b-27; and
(d)  possess the minimum number of hours of experience in real property
appraisal as established by rule.
(5)  The courses of study under Subsection (4)(c) shall be conducted by:
(a)  a college or university;
(b)  a community or junior college;
(c)  a real estate appraisal or real estate related organization;
(d)  a state or federal agency or commission;
(e)  a proprietary school;
(f)  a provider approved by a state certification and licensing agency; or
(g)  the Appraisal Foundation or its boards.
(6)  The board shall require and pass upon proof necessary to determine the
honesty, competency, integrity, and truthfulness of each applicant.
